dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.fat.dix
  <!-- orjentazzjoni_sesswali; orjentazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="orjentazzjoni/_sesswali__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>_sesswali</l>
          <r>_sesswali<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet<b/>sesswali</l>
          <r>_sesswali<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lingwa; lingw; 2 -->
    <pardef n="lingw/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- perċezzjoni; perċezzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="perċezzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- toqba_tas-sorm; toq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="toq/ba_tas-sorm__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ba_tas-sorm</l>
          <r>ba_tas-sorm<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob<b/>tas-sorm</l>
          <r>ba_tas-sorm<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- superstizzjoni; superstizzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="superstizzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kaptana; kaptan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kaptan/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- traġedja; traġedj; 2 -->
    <pardef n="traġedj/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tentazzjoni; tentazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tentazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- teknoloġija; teknoloġij; 2 -->
    <pardef n="teknoloġij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żrinġ; żrinġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="żrinġ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gzira; gz; 2 -->
    <pardef n="gz/ira__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ira</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjer</l>
          <r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kanzunetta; kanzunett; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kanzunett/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tifel; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ifel__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ifel</l>
          <r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fal</l>
          <r>ifel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- manifestazzjoni; manifestazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="manifestazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pajjiż; pajjiż; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pajjiż__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għasfura; għas; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għas/fura__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fura</l>
          <r>fura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>afar</l>
          <r>fura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tabib; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/abib__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abib</l>
          <r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obba</l>
          <r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- proġett; proġett; 2 -->
    <pardef n="proġett__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kontribuzzjoni; kontribuzzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kontribuzzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kwistjoni; kwistjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kwistjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kontaminazzjoni; kontaminazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kontaminazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- artal; artal; 2 -->
    <pardef n="artal__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- varjazzjoni; varjazzjoni; 2 -->
    <pardef n="varjazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jiet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mistoqsija; mistoqsij; 2 -->
    <pardef n="mistoqsij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- extrej; extrej; 2 -->
    <pardef n="extrej__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="orjentazzjoni_sesswali"><i>orjentazzjoni</i><par n="orjentazzjoni/_sesswali__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lingwa"><i>lingw</i><par n="lingw/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="perċezzjoni"><i>perċezzjoni</i><par n="perċezzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba_tas-sorm"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba_tas-sorm__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="superstizzjoni"><i>superstizzjoni</i><par n="superstizzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kaptana"><i>kaptan</i><par n="kaptan/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="traġedja"><i>traġedj</i><par n="traġedj/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tentazzjoni"><i>tentazzjoni</i><par n="tentazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="teknoloġija"><i>teknoloġij</i><par n="teknoloġij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żrinġ"><i>żrinġ</i><par n="żrinġ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gzira"><i>gz</i><par n="gz/ira__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kanzunetta"><i>kanzunett</i><par n="kanzunett/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tifel"><i>t</i><par n="t/ifel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="manifestazzjoni"><i>manifestazzjoni</i><par n="manifestazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pajjiż"><i>pajjiż</i><par n="pajjiż__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfura"><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fura__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tabib"><i>t</i><par n="t/abib__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="proġett"><i>proġett</i><par n="proġett__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kontribuzzjoni"><i>kontribuzzjoni</i><par n="kontribuzzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kwistjoni"><i>kwistjoni</i><par n="kwistjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kontaminazzjoni"><i>kontaminazzjoni</i><par n="kontaminazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="artal"><i>artal</i><par n="artal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="varjazzjoni"><i>varjazzjoni</i><par n="varjazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mistoqsija"><i>mistoqsij</i><par n="mistoqsij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="extrej"><i>extrej</i><par n="extrej__n_m"/></e>
